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DIAGNOSTICS - ENGINE

DI30Z-01

DTC PO 120/41| Throttle Position Sensor Circuit Malfunction

CIRCUIT DESCRIPTION

Throttle position sensor is mounted on the throttle body and it has the 2 sensors to detect the throttle opening
angle and the malfunction of the throttle position sensor’s own.

The voltage applied to the terminals VTA and VTA2 of the engine ECU changes between 0 V and 5 V in
proportion to the opening angle of the throttle valve.

The engine ECU judges the current opening angle of the throttle valve from these signals input from termi-
nals VTA and VTA2, and the engine ECU controls the throttle motor to make the throttle valve angle properly
in response to driving condition.

If this DTC is stored, the engine ECU shuts down the power for the throttle motor and the electromagnetic
clutch, and the throttle valve is fully closed by the return spring.

However, the opening angle of the throttle valve can be controlled by the accelerator pedal through the
throttle cable.
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DTC No. DTC Detecting Condition Trouble Area
Conditions (a), (b), (c), (d) or (e) continues for 2.0 seconds:
(@) VTA = 0.2V
(b)VTA2 = 0.5V
(©)VTA = 4.8V * Open orshortinthrottle position sensor circuit
P0120/41 | ()WhenVTA z 0.2Vand = 2.0V,andVTA2 Z 4.97V * Throttle position sensor
(€) VTA —-VTA2 < 0.02V,0orVTA2 -VTA < 0.02V *Engine ECU
Condition (a) continues for 0.4 seconds:
(@)VTA = 0.2VandVTA2 = 0.5V
HINT:

Afterconfirming DTC P0120/41usethehand  —heldtesterto confirmthethrottle valve opening percentage.

Accelerator pedal position expressed as percentage and voltage
Acceleratorpedalreleased Acceleratorpedaldepressed Trouble area
THROTTLEPOS THROTTLEPOS#2 THROTTLEPOS THROTTLEPOS#2
0% ov 0% ov VClineopen
0% 2.0-2.9V 0% 47-51V VTA line open or grand short
8-20% ov 64 -96% ov VTA2lineopenorgrandshort
100 % 5V 100 % 5V E2line open
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WIRING DIAGRAM

*1: Only for Europe
*2: Except Europe
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INSPECTION PROCEDURE
HINT:

. If DTC P0110/24 (Intake Air Temp. Circuit Malfunction), P0115/22 (Water Temp. Circuit Malfunction),
P0120/41 (Throttle Position Sensor Circuit Malfunction), P1120/19 (Accelerator Pedal Position Sensor

Circuit Malfunction) are output simultaneously, E2 (Sensor Ground) may be open.

. Read freeze frame data using hand-held tester. Because freeze frame records the engine conditions
when the malfunction is detected, when troubleshooting it is useful for determining whether the vehicle
was running or stopped, the engine warmed up or not, the air-fuel ratio lean or rich, etc. at the time

of the malfunction.
When using hand-held tester

1 Connect hand-held tester, read throttle valve opening percentage.

PREPARATION:

CHECK:

(@ Connect the hand-held tester to DLCS.
(b)  Turnthe ignition switch ON and switch the hand-held tes-
ter main switch ON.

Read the throttle valve opening percentage for VTA circuit and
read the voltage for VTAZ2 circuit.

OK:
FI17052 Throttl | i
recelonat » ro .t_e valve open(;ng Voltage
ccelerator peda osition expresse
P P P (VTA2)
as percentage (VTA)

Released 8-20% 20-29V
Depressed 64 — 96 % 47 -51V

OK Check and replace engine ECU
(See page IN-19).
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2 | Check voltage between terminals VC and E2 of engine ECU connector.

@ON

PREPARATION:

(@) Remove the glove compartment door.
(b)  Turn the ignition switch ON.
CHECK:
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Measure voltage between terminals VC and E2 of the engine
ECU
connector.
OK:
Voltage: 4.5 -5.5V

NG Check and replace engine ECU
(See page IN-19).

3 Check voltage between terminals VTA, VTA2 and E2 of engine ECU connector.
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PREPARATION:

(@) Remove the glove compartment door.

(b)  Turn the ignition switch ON.

CHECK:

Measure voltage between terminals VTA, VTA2 and E2 of the
engine ECU connector.

OK:
Voltage
Accelerator pedal
VTA VTA2
Released 0.4-1.0V 20-29V
Depressed 3.2-48V 47 -51V

NG Check and replace engine ECU
(See page IN-19).
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4 [ Check throttle position sensor (See page FI-40).

(See page FI-40).

NG> Replace throttle position sensor

@

Check for open and short in harness and connector between engine ECU and throttle position
sensor (VC, VTA, VTA2, E2 line) (See page IN-19).

Whennotusinghand -heldtester

1 Checkvoltage between terminals VC and E2 of engine ECU connector.

@ON PREPARATION:

(@ Remove the glove compartment door.

(b)  Turn the ignition switch ON.

CHECK:

Measure voltage between terminals VC and E2 of the engine
ECU connector.

Voltage:4.5 - 5.5V

BE6653

A02365 A05001
NG> Check and replace engine ECU

(See page IN-19).
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2 | Check voltage between terminals VTA, VTA2 and E2 of engine ECU connector.

PREPARATION:

(a) Remove the glove compartment door.

(b)  Turn the ignition switch ON.

CHECK:

Measure voltage between terminals VTA, VTA2 and E2 of the
engine ECU connector.

OK:
Voltage
E(I)EE?269563 A05002 Accelerator pedal VA VTAZ
Released 04-10V 20-29V
Depressed 3.2-48V 47-51V

(See page IN-19).

OK> Check and replace engine ECU

NG

3 | Check throttle position sensor (See page FI-40).

(See page FI-40).

NG> Replace throttle position sensor

OK

Check for open and short in harness and connector between engine ECU and throttle position
sensor (VC, VTA, VTA2, E2 line) (See page IN-19).
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